test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_biitoosijigan_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ibiitoosijiganensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ibiitoosijiganensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ibiitoosijiganensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ibiitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ibiitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ibiitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ibiitoosijiganensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ibiitoosijiganensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ibiitoosijiganensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ibiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ibiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ibiitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ibiitoosijiganensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ibiitoosijiganensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ibiitoosijiganensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ibiitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ibiitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ibiitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
